District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-1750

Transfer of license; change of status; brokerage firms.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 13, 30 DCR 390
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(k), 31 DCR 4023
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(n), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1932.